Washington statutes.
RCW 43.163.170

Nonrecourse revenue bonds—Owner and trustee, enforcement of rights.

Any owner of bonds of the authority issued under this chapter, and the trustee under any trust agreement or indenture, may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus or other proceeding, protect and enforce any of their respective rights, and may become the purchaser at any foreclosure sale if the person is the highest bidder, except to the extent the rights given are restricted by the authority in any bond resolution or trust agreement or indenture authorizing the issuance of the bonds.

[ 1989 c 279 s 18.]